New Jersey, session 222, A798.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding any law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, upon and after the effective date of this section, any State entity that issues legally required notices to businesses operating in this State shall provide, to the maximum extent practicable, an optional service for businesses to receive such notices electronically.  Such notices may include, but need not be limited to, notices of violations, underpayment notifications, and employee unemployment claims. Within 60 days of the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), each State entity responsible for issuing legally required notices to businesses shall notify any business within their purview of the optional notification service to be provided pursuant to this section and provide such businesses with the necessary information to opt in to the electronic notification service. b.    For the purposes of this section, State entity means a State department or agency in the Executive Branch of State Government, and any board, commission, corporation, authority, or instrumentality thereof. 2.    This act shall take effect on the 90th day following the date of enactment.